Utah statutes.
59-7-116.   Taxation of regulated investment companies.

(1)  A regulated investment company or a fund of such a company, as defined in Sections 851(a) or 851(g), Internal Revenue Code, which is organized under the laws of Utah, shall determine Utah taxable income as follows:

(a)  calculate investment company taxable income, as determined in Section 852(b)(2), Internal Revenue Code;

(b)  add any municipal interest and the exclusion of net capital gain provided in Section 852(b)(2)(A), Internal Revenue Code; and

(c)  subtract the deduction for the capital gain dividends and exempt interest dividends as defined in Sections 852(b)(3)(C) and 852(b)(5), Internal Revenue Code.

(2)  A regulated investment company which is organized under the laws of Utah or a fund of such a company, shall be taxed at the same rate and in the same manner as a corporation as provided in this chapter.

